hyphenate_patterns/hyph-uk.tex
% File: hyph-uk.tex
% TeX hyphenation patterns for Ukrainian (modern rules)
% in UTF-8 encoding.
%
% Version 1.01.  Released 28 July 1999.
% Copyright 1999 Andrij Shvaika
%
% This program can be redistributed and/or modified under the terms
% of the LaTeX Project Public License distributed from CTAN
% archives in directory macros/latex/base/lppl.txt; either
% version 1 of the License, or any later version.
%
% Created by Andrij Shvaika using Frank Liang's PATGEN 2.3.
% These patterns are based on a file of more than 84000 Ukrainian words
% hyphenated according to the modern rules.
%
% Please, send bug reports via e-mail:
%               ashv@icmp.lviv.ua
\patterns{
.ак1р
.ана5л
.андо5
.ап1р
.аси3
.ато2мн
.бра5л
.вакуу4
.вг4
.вз4
.ви3с4
.виш4к
.вў4дн
.вў2дц
.вў4л3л
.вк2
.вло5
.вс4
.вт4
.ге3л
.дж2
.дў2йд
.дру3
.еле3
.ес3т
.за4вж2
.за∙4
.зб4
.зд2
.зна1
.зов2с
.йш4
.кў2д
.ку4ль
.ку3н
.ла3ц
.ль2
.мо2вб
.мо4в5ч
.мс4
.на3в
.нав4ч
.на4дл
.на3л
.нас4
.небе4
.не5в2
.нес4
.нўх2т
.нок1
.об3л
.од3в
.оз2
.озб3
.ок3л
.ок1р
.оп2л
.оп1р
.ос1в
.ос3л
.ос1м
.ос3п
.ос3т
.ос5ти
.от3в
.от3р
.ох1в
.пў2в
.пўз5
.пло5м
.пот3во
.приї2
.при3нт
.прис4
.пх2
.ре2й
.ру2ц
.си4лк
.сў1
.ск4
.сп4
.ст4
.те2х
.тк4
.трис2
.тх4
.ть2
.уг2
.уд2р
.уе2
.у∙2ст
.ук4л
.ум2
.ум4л
.уп2
.ус2
.ус4т
.хребе2
.ць2
.ча2ї
.шес5
.шк4
а1а4
аа5з
а1б
а3бў
абў3о
2або
абос4
аб3ри
а1в
ав2б
а3в2в
а2вг
ав2га
а3вж
ав2же
ав2зя
авў2а
авў1др
ав3л
авм3р
ав2ну
аво3б
авоз4
авос2
а3вп
авп3р
ав3р
а2вс
а3вси
ав2сў
авс3т
а4в3т
авт3р
а3вч
ав2ча
а1г
а5га
а2гб
агў3р
аг2л
аг5ла
аг3лў
аг1ро
аг1ру
а1є
ає1р
а1д
а2д3в
а3д4вў
а2дз
адў2й
адўс5л
а3дли
а3д2о
а3дра.
а2дрў
ад2ро
а3дш
а3дь
а1е
ае2д
ае2л
аерос2
ае4т
а1ї
а2їс
а1ж
а2жк
а1з
а3за
азах1
аз2в
а2зг
а3зи
аз2ў
аз2р
а1ў2
а1∙1
а∙3д
а∙4ди
а∙4дў
а∙2ль
а3йо
ай3шл
а1к
а3ка
а3ки
ак1лю.
ако3мба
ак3ро
а1л
а3лў
а4лк
ал3л
ало3в2
а3лса
а2ль
аль3в
а3льк
а4льн
а3льс
а3льт
а3льч
2алю.
а1м
4амаг
а2мк
а4мка
а4мко
а4мку
а3мм
а3мс
а5мсо
а1н
а2н1а2ме
а3нв
а3нг
анўс2к
анўт2р
анк3р
а3нл
ан1о2те
ан2сп
ант2р
а3нф
а3нх
а3ньк
а2н'
а3о2
ао3б
ао3в
ао4д
ао3к
аос3
а1п
апе3л
апў2в
апўдоз3
апос3
ап1ри
ап3с
а1р
а3рв
ар2ве
ар2ву
арей2ц
аре3о
а3ри
а3рм
аро2дн
ароо3к
а3рр
ар3тс
а1с
а3сб
асинх3
4аск
а3сл
ас2лов
ас1ма
ас2п
ас3пе
а3сс
ас3тн
асуп1
а1т
1атак
2атер
атў3о
ат3рў
а4тс
а3ту
ат3ха
а3ть
а1у
ау2в
ау4му
ау2че
а1ф
2афў
аф5л
2а1х
ах3лю
ах1р
ах3ро
а1ц
1ацеп
а3цз
а3цў
а1ч
а1ш
аш3к
аш3л
аш2м
а1щ
а1ю
а1я
ая2в
ба3д
бак1л
б1б2
б1в
б1г
б2га
2б1є
2б1д2
бди3
бе2з3
бе4за2
без5д
бе4зк
бе3рл
бе2са
бе4с2ка
бе2сн
бе4ц
б1ж
б1з2
б4и
би2вс
бид4в
бў2б
бў3бр
бўг2р
бўй3д
бў3ллю
бўль1
3бўо
бў4он
бў3осу
бў2оц
бўп4
бўт2ну
бўя5
2б1к
б1л
3блўї
3блў∙
3блўй
3блўя
б2лок
блу3
2б4ль
2б1м
б3н
бо3б
бовў3
бо1з
боз2б
боз2в
бо2йм
бо4йн
бо2ре3н
б2орў
б2ору
боф4
бо3ц
2б1п
бприс3
б1р
2бр.
б2рес
б2рит
б2рўд
б3ро∙
б3рою
б2роя
2брс
б2рух
2б3с2
бс4к
бс3тр
5бсу
4бсь
3бся
б3т2
3бто
бт3ру
3бур
бу3с
бу3тс
2б1х
бхў4
б1ц
б1ч
б1ш2
2б1щ
бю2с
б'1яз
1ва.
ва3бк
2вав
ваг1р
3ватў
в1б2
3вба
в3бе
в2бив
в2бир
в2бл
2в1в2
в2ве
в4ви
ввўб3
ввўг3
ввў2д
ввў3з
ввўй5
ввўп1
ввўр3в
в1г2
2вг.
3вга
вгви3
вг3не
вг3ну
в1д2
в2да
в3да.
в2диб
вд4м
вдоб3
в2дов
в2дог
вдос3
вд4р
вд5ри
2вдь
3вдьс
в2дя
1вед
ве3з
3вей
ве3о
1вес
3веч
2в1ж
3вжи
в1з
4вз.
взак3
вз2в
вз2г
взд2
в3зк
в3зс
4в2зь
виб2
вибо2рц
ви3в2
виг2
виз3в
викла3
вип2
вис2
вис4к
ви3с4п
вит2
вит4р
вит6ри
3виш
виш2ка
вия4
вў2ак
вў2ам
вў2ац
в2ў3в
вўд1ж
вў2дл
вў2дно
вў2дня
вўдст4
1вўж
вў2зн
3вўк
1вўл
вў3лл
вў4ллю
вў2мл
вў3о
вў3рс
вў3сс
вў3те
вўт3н
3вўу
в1й
2в1к
в3ки
вкў3н
вк4р
в1л
в2ла
в3лю
в1м2
в2ман
в2ме
в2ми
в3ми.
в2мў
в2мр
в1н
2вн.
вна3
3вна.
внак1
внас3
3вни.
3внў.
3внўв
в3нь
3вня
во1
3во.
воб2
во2бе
вов2ж
1вод
вое4
воз2м
во∙2д
3волящ
воп2
3вора
3вори.
во2х1а2
во2хм
во2хт
1воюв
2в1п2
впа3
в2пев
впўв1
вп3лю
вп3ля
впос3
впош3
вприс5
в1р
4вр.
3вре
в2рож
вро1зм
в2рот
в5рс
в2ря
в1с2
3вса
в4се1
всес2
3всў
в3сўб
3вс4к
вс4л
вс3то
вст2р
4всть
4всь
в2сю
3вся
в2сяк
в1т2
2вт.
в3та
в2тў
вт4к4
вт5ка
вт3н
в3то.
в3тоб
втос2
2вть2
в2тям
ву2дц
ву2час
2в1ф
в1х
2вх.
в3ц
3вце
3вця
2в1ч
4вч.
в2чаї
в2чал
в2чаю
вч2в
4вчий
в3чис
3в2чит
в2чишс
в2чо
в2чус
в1ш
2вш.
вши5в
вшў3
2вшо
3вшов
в1щ
вя4тв
1вяч
1в'4
1га
гае2
га2йм
га2рбн
г1б
г1в
г3ва.
г3ви.
г3во
г3д
2гд.
ге2й
ге3йо
ге3к
ге2о
гео∙2
2г1з
5ги
1гў1
гў3ї
гў3м
гў3нд
гў2рни
гў3т
2г1к
г3ла
г5ла.
г1ли
г3лив
г3лис
г2лўж
г3лов
г3лод
г2лу
2гль
г3лю
г3ляв
г1ляр
г1лят
г3м
3гмў
г1н
гнўт2р
г2ної
г2ною
гня3
1го
го3в
гов2к
голо∙2
горо1
го2спр
го3ст
2гр.
г2рав
г2раї
г2рам
г2раф
г1рац
г2раю
г2реч
г1рич
г2рў
гро1
гро3д
гро3з
г3с
гск4
г3т
3гу
гу4льц
г1ц
2г1ш4
2є1з
є1л
єо4л
єу4льц
1да
да4в3ч
2д1б2
д3бач
д1в2
двит3
д2во
двос2
двоя2
д3вч
3двя
2д1г2
д1є
2д1д2
ддос3
1де
де2з1
дек2л
3ден
де3о
де4ом
дес2тр
дех2
дея4
2дж.
дж2б
1джем
1джу
дз2
2дз.
д2за
д1зв
д2зе
д2зи
2дзк
д2зу
д2зя
1д6и
ди4мч
3динк
дип4т
ди4рк
2дисв
ди2ск
ди2сл
дист2
ди2стр
диф3р
1дў
дў2ало
дў2ам
дў3д
дўз4
дўй5
2д1ў4ме
2д1ўнс
дўоп3л
дў4ор
дўс2
дўс4л
дў5т
3дўя
д1й
2д3к2
дко3
дкос4
д1л
2дл.
1дла
2дле
д5ли
2д1м
д3ма
4дмо
1д1н
3дна.
дна4в
дна2й
2днац
2днед
2днес
2днех
д3ни
4дниз
2днир
2днўм
д2нўп
2днов
2днор
днос2та
2дноч
2днош
д3нь
2дньоз
2дняв
2днял
1до1
2д1обў
доб2рат
добс3
до4вж
до2вс
до3в2ч
дод2
до3ї
доз2
до∙2
до2й
док2р
до2мна
до3нта
доп2
3дор
дос2
дос4в
3доси
дос4н
до2со
дос3тан
до3у4
2д1ох
до2хо
дох2р
дош2
2д3п2
д1р
4др.
д5ра.
2дрив
д2рип
д3рўз
д3ров
дрок2
д3рон
д3ру.
д2руг
д3руж
д2рук
дрю4ч2ч
2д3с2
дса2дн
3дси.
3дсў.
дс4л
дс3ме
дс4н
дсти5
дст2р
дст3ри
4дсь
2д1т2
4дт.
д3та
3дтам
1ду
ду4мо
дуп3л
2д1уро
ду2роч
2д1ф2
2д1х
дхў1
1д1ц
2дцеме
2дцўд
д1ч
2дчу
2д1ш2
дшва3
3дшн
дш3ту
д1щ
2дь
4дь.
3дьк
3дьм
3дьо
5дьс
3дьц
дюр1
1дя
дя3д
2д'1
д'ї2
д'2їк
д'я2
е1а
еа2б
еабих2
еабия2
еа2де
еа2к
еа3кто
еа2м
еа2те
е3б
ебе3зп
е4бль
еб2рех
е4бс
е3в
ев2б
ев2г
ев2ди
ев2же
евит5
ев2п
ев2ра
е4вс
е5в2си
е4вт
е6вти
е5в4тў
е5в2тр
е1г
ег2нў
ег4ра.
ег1ро
е1є2
е1д
е3д2б
е2дв
е3дво
е2дек
ед2з
е2дзь
е2д1ў2с3
е4дмў
е2дна
едоб2
едос3к
е3дру
едс4
е2д1ум
ед1у2чо
е2дч
е1е2
еек3
е1ї
е1ж
е1з
езас5
е2зб
ез2би
е2з1в
езг3р
ез2д
е3зе
е2зз
е3зи
е3зк
е2зл
е2зм
езо2р
е2зр
езу4м
езумо2
езу2п
е1ў2
е1∙
е∙2д
е∙да6л
е∙3ду
е2йми
ей2мо
е2йш
е1к
ек2ва
1е2кз
ек3ле
ек1р
ек2ред
е3кц
е1л
е5лг
елў4оц
е3лк
е3лт
е2льс
е3льт
е3льш
е3лю
е1м
е3ма
е3мз
е3ми
емис2
ем2к
е2мка
2е3мо
ем1х
е1н
енав3ч
енап3
енап1р
е2нб
енг4
ен3дл
ене3о
ензоо4
ент3р
ен3тра
е3нх
е2нчас
е4ньк
е1о2б
еог2
е3о4г3л
ео4дм
ео2дн
ео2др
еоз2
е1о2зор
е4ок4
е5о4ков
е3оле
е3о4ль
е3оля
е5омо
е1он
ео3нт
еоп2
ео2пал
ео4пе
е2опо
е3о4под
е1ор
е1о2с2
еос3в
е2о3ст
е2от
е1о2х
ео2цў
е1о2ч
е1п
епўз4
епўс2
епот3р
еприя3
еп3с
е1р
е3рбў
е4рвн
ердос4
е2рж
ерис2к
е2рўн
е3рк
е2рлю
е3рни
е1с
еск1л
ес2коп
еск1р
ес3ме
ес5н
есп5л
ес2пр
ес2тар
ес5тў
ест3р
ес3тре
ест4рў
е2сь
е3ськ
е1т
е3та.
етас2
ет3в
ет4во
е3те
е2тм
ет2не
ет2ну
е5то
етран3
е3ть
е4тю
е1у2
еу4г
еук3
е1ф
еф2р
е1х
е2хм
е2хна
ех3о4г3
ех2р
е5цьк
е3ч
е1ш
еш3т
е1щ
е1я2
ея3н
еяс5
2ї1б
ї1в
ї3ва
2ївў
2ївм
3ї2вр
ївс3
1їг
ї2д
ї3де
2ї1ж
2ї1з2
1ї3к
ї1л
ї2ль
ї1м
ї3ме
3їмн
ї2мнў
1ї3му
ї1н
3їнн
2їно
ї3нт
2ї1о2
2ї1п
3їпа
їприк3
їприс3
ї1р
ї3рв
ї3рду
ї4рс
ї1с
2їс2л
ї3т
їт2в
2ї1у2
їук3
ї1ф
2ї1ч
ї1ш
2ж1ад
1жак
ж1а2ме
2ж1а2п
1жах
ж1б2
2жв.
ж1ви
ж1вў
2ж4г
ж5га
ж5гў
ж5го
ж1д
2ждь
же3з
же3сь
2ж1ж
2ж1з
1жи
ж1к
ж1л
ж2лу
ж1м
2жм.
жмик1
2жмў
2жмо
ж3н
жов3то
жов3ч
жостў3
жот3
2ж1р
ж1с
2ж1уп
жу2пр
ж1ц
ж1ч
2ж1ш2
1за1
3з2аб2
3з2ав
зав2ч
заг2
за3дв
зади5
2заїм
заз2
за∙2
зай2д
зай4т
зай4ш
зак2
за2кт
за3м
зана3
зап2
зар2в
зас4
зат2
з3а4ф
заш4
з1б2
з2баг
збо3
2зв.
з1ва
з1ви
з1вў
звў3дс
звў3дт
з2вўс
з1вор
з1г2
зг4ро
з1д
2зд.
з3дк
з2до
з3дов
з4дор
з2др
з4дь
1з2е
зе2мк
3земн
з1ж
з1з2
ззб3
1ззю
1з2и
3зир
зит2р
1зў
3зў.
зўб2
зўг4
зў1д2
3з2ўї
зўз4
3зў∙
зўй2д
зў2л
зўм2
з1ўн
з2ўнк
зў4нт
зў2о
зў3онн
зўп4
зўт4
3зўя
1з2й
2з3к2
4зк.
зк3н
4зкр
з1л
4зл.
з1м2
2зм.
з2мўш
3зму
1з1н
з2на
зна3д
знайш4
з4нан
з3ни
з4ниж
з4нищ
з2нўм
знўя5
3зно
3зну
4знь
1зо
зоб2л
зовў1
зог2
зо4г3л
3з4од
зо1з4
зок2р
зо2кс
зо3нт
зо2оп
з5о2п5л
зос2
зос4л
зо2со
зост2
зо2сти
зо3т
зот2л
зоф2
2з1п4
4зпек
4зпец
4зпў
зпўз4
зпри3
зпрок1
з1р
з4ра.
4зрах
з3ри
з4ри.
з2рўї
з2рўн
з2рўт
з2рўю
з3рю.
2з1с4
з3т2
зт3в
1зу
3зу.
зус2
зу2сп
зуспў2
зуст2
з1ф
2з1х2
з1ц
2з1ч
з1ш
з2шив
2з1щ
4зь.
3зьб
4зьб.
3зьк
1зя
зя3в
2зял
з4'2
з'1ї3
з'4∙3
з'5∙з
з'3я
и1а
и1б
ибў2рн
ибў2рц
и3бл
иб2лу
иб2р
и3бс
и2бш
и1в
и3ва
ив3да
и4в3к
ив3с
и1г
иг4ла
иг2нў
иг2но
иг1ро
и1є
и1д
и3д2б
ид2в
ид3ва
ид2лу
и3д2м
ид2р
ид3ра
ид3рў
и3дь
и1ї
иї2мно
и1ж
иж1в
и1з
из2б
из2в
из1во
и3зк
изо3
из2р
и1и
и1ў
и1∙
и1й
ий2д
и4йк
ий2ме
ий2с
ий4т
ий2ш
и1к
ик2в
и2кд
ик3ле
ик3лў
ик2м
ик2ре
ик2ро
и1л
и3лк
и2л1о2р
и3льк
и3м
и4мд
им2рў
и4мс
им2сў
и1н
ина2й
и3нва
и3нд
инк2ре
и3но
ино∙2
и3нь
и1о2
и1п
ип2ле
ип3лў
ип2лю
ип5н
ипра3
и3р
ирис2
и5рки
и5рни
и1с
и2сб
ис2в
иск2
ис2м
и2спа
ис4пи
ис2пў
ис3пўл
исп3л
и2спо
и2спр
и3с2с
ис4се
ис3тў
исток1
ист3ре
ист3рў
ис4ть
и1т
и3та
ит3н
и4тт
ит2ч
и1у2
и1ф
иф2ра
иф3та
и1х
их2л
их2р
их4ра
и1ц
и1ч
ич4т
и1ш
ишк3р
иш4ли
и2шль
иш2м
иш2ту
и1щ
и1ю
и1я
ия2з
ия4зно
ия4м
ия2р
ў1а
ў2агр
ў3ама
ўа2мў
ў3ан.
ў3ана
ў3ас
ўас2к
ў3ату
ўах4
ў1б
ў3бд
ў3бс
ў1в
ўв1ав
ўв1арк
ўва2чк
ў2вб
ў2вг
ў2в3д
ў3ве
ў4вж
ў2вз
ў3вўв
ўв1ўм
ў2вм
ўв1об
ўво2к
ўв1ока
ў3вон
ўв1о2с
ў3воч
ў2вр
ў2вс
ў2в3т
ў2в1уча
ў4вч
ў3вя
ў3г
ўг3в
ўг2н
ўг3нў
ўг1р
ўг3ри
ў5да
ўд3в
ў2дек
ўд3з
ўдў3
ўдўб2
ўдў5й
ўдўс3
ўдўт2
ў2дна
ў3днї
ў3дни
ўдоб2
ў2д1ос
ўд3ру
ўдс4
ў2дце
ў1е2
ўе3з
ўе4т
ў1ї
ў3їм
ў3їн
ў3їч
ў3їш
ў1ж
ў2жб
ў2жв
ў3жж
ў2жк
ў2жл
ў2жна
ў1з
ўз2в
ўз3д
ў2зз
ўз2л
ўз3н
1ўзот
2ў1∙
ў1йд
ў2йм
ў4йн
ў1йт
ўй4ти
ўй2ш
ў1к
ўка3в
ўк1л
ўк1рў
ўк3ро
ў1л
ўл1а2м
ў3ле
ў3ли
ў4лла
ў4лли
ў3ло
ў5льн
ў5льо
ў4льц
ў2льч
ў3лю
ў3ля
ў1м
ў3ма
ўмане3
ў2мн
2ў3мо
ў3мп
ўм2р
ў2мч
ў1н
ў3нда
ў3нл
2ўнн
2ў3но
ўноу5
ўн3с
ў3нсо
ўнс4п
ўнс2та
ўнс4ц
ў3нт
1ўнф
2ўнц
ў2нч
ў3ньк
2ўня
ў1о
ў2ов
ў2о∙2
ў3олу
ў3он.
ў3онў
ў3ону
ў2оп
ў3опт
ў3ор
ў2ос
ў3ос.
ў2оте
ў4ох
ў1п
ўпод5
ўп1р
ў3пт
ў1р
ў3р2в
ў3рд
ўрет3
ў4рк
ў3рм
ўро∙2
ў3рр
ў3рт
ў1с
ўсў2м
ўск3р
ўс3л
ўс1м
ў2сме
ўс5н
ўс4па
ўс4по
ўс2са
ўс2се
ў4ссю
ўст3р
ў1т
ў4тв
ў2т1е2м
ў3тл
ўт2не
ў3то3
ў3ту
ў2тф
ў3тц
ў1у
ў1ф
ў1х
ўх1в
ўх1р
ў1ц
ў2цт
ў1ч
ў1ш
ўш3к
ў1щ
ў3ю
2ў1я
ўя2де
ўя4к
ўя3ка
∙1в
∙3вк
∙4вко
∙2вс
∙1д
∙3да5л
∙2дл
∙2днў
∙2з
∙4з3д
∙3зо
∙3зу
∙1к
∙3ка.
∙2ку
∙1л
2∙ла
∙2ло
∙2лц
∙3ль
∙4льс
∙1м
∙1н
∙3на
∙3ни
∙3нк
∙3но
∙1р
∙1с
∙2сте
∙1т
∙3ть
∙1ц
∙3ч
∙1ш
∙1щ
й1б2
2й1в
й1г2
й1д2
й3да
й2дус
1йї
й1ж
й1з
2й3к
2й1л
й2ль
1й1м
2йм.
й2мен
2йменш
2ймн
2й3н
3йня
4йнятл
1й6о
й1п
й2пф
й1р
4й1с
йс2к
йс1м
й2с3ф
й2сш
й1т
2йт.
2й3та
й2тм
й1ф
2йх4
й1ха
й1хо
йхс3
4й1ц
2й1ч
1й1ш
2йшв
й2шл
й4шли
й2шн
1йя
ка4в3ч
ка3д
к4аз
ка2й
ка3л
ка4лл
ка5мс
кант3р
кап1р
ка3т
2каф
2к1б
к1в
к3ва.
к3ват
к3ви.
квў3д
к1г
к1д
2кеа
к1ж
к1з
к2и
3ки.
2киг
кў1д
кў2л
кў4ль
кў2нц
кў3о
2кўп
кўп3ру
к3к
2кл.
к2ле
к4лей
к3лем
3кли
к2лин
к2лў
к3лўв
к3лўс
к4лоз
к3лос
2к4ль
к1м
к1н
к2ниж
2кнот
к3ну
ко1
3ко.
3ков
ков2ж
3ког
когў3
ко3ї3
коз2б
коз2м
коко3
колў2ї
3ком
ко3мби
3конў
ко2нц
3копи
3копл
3кос
кос6н
ко3ст
3кот
кот3р
3коче
3кош
кош4к
кош5т
2кр.
к1рав
к1рам
к1раш
к2реа
крис3л
к1рич
к3рўб
к3рўм
к1ро
к2ров
к3руж
к1руз
к2руч
к1с
2кс.
ксе2ль
ксў3
к2с3к
к3скр
к2с3л
4к2сп
ксп3л
2кст.
к2сте
кст3р
к2сф
к2сц
2ксь
к3т
4кт.
ктоо3
2ктр.
к4у
ку3б
кудо4
ку2ль
ку4льг
ку4льм
к1ф
к1х2
к1ц
к1ч
к1ш2
2кш.
3кше
к1щ
3ла.
1лаг
ла2гм
1лаз
3лак
1лам
лант3р
ла2пс
1лася
2л1б
л1в
3л1г
4лгўд
4лго
л1є
л1д
1ле
лев3р
ле3дв
ле3дд
лед2р
ле3з
3лем.
3лео
ле2об
ле1оп
ле2рга
лет3н
3лею
2лї
л1ж
л1з
3ли.
1лив
ли2вс
1лиг
2лиж
3лий
ли3нв
1лў
3лў.
лўв2о3
лўг2
лў1дж
3лўї
3лўз
3лўк
лў6ль
3лўнг
лў3нд
лў2о
лў3оз
лў3ом
лў3оц
3лўп
лўу2
лўх2р
3лўш
2л3к
4лк.
2л1л
л3ла
3ллї
л4ль
4лля.
л2ляв
л1м
2лм.
2лме
л1н
1ло
ло5бл
лоб2р
ло2бч
3ло1з
3ло3м
ло4мба
3лонн
ло3нт
ло4нти
лоо3к
ло2рал
ло2рам
ло2рб
ло4рв
ло2рет
лоро1
2л1п
2л1с
л1т
4лт.
1лу
3лу.
3лув
3луї
4лут
3лую
4л1ф2
л1х
лх1в
4лхв.
л1ц
л1ч
4ль.
2льб.
3льв
3льг
3льд
3льї
3льз
3льй
2льк
4льк.
3льм
4льм.
2льн.
3льо
3льп
4льп.
2льр
4льс.
3льст
4льсь
3лься
2льт
4льт.
4льтр.
4льф.
3льц
3льчи
2льш
3лью
3лья
3люв
1люї
1люз
1люс
3лют
1люш
2лющ
1люю
5ля.
ля3в
1ляї
2лял
1лянў
ля3с
1ляю
1ма.
1маг
ма3∙
мак3л
малос4
1ман
манўя5
маф2
м1б
4мб.
м3ба
2мбль
2мбр.
мбу2рн
м1в
2м3г
м1д
1ме
ме2доб
ме2д3о4г3
ме3з
3менш
ме2рг
3меш
м1ж
м1з
2мза
1ми
ми4йн
3миш
мў2жа
мў2жд
1мўй
1мўн
мў3нд
мў4нте
мў3ом
мў3рс
1мўч
м1к
м3ка
2мке
м3ки
м3ко
2мк1р
м3ку
м1л
млет2
2м2ль
2м1м
м1н
4мн.
мнас3
2мни.
1мо1
мо3вп
мов3ч
моз2
мо∙2
